Washington statutes.
RCW 12.08.020

What constitute pleadings.

The pleadings in the justice's court shall be:

(1) The complaint of the plaintiff, which shall state in a plain and direct manner the facts constituting the cause of action.

(2) The answer of the defendant, which may contain a denial of the complaint, or any part thereof; and also a statement, in a plain and direct manner, of any facts constituting a defense.

(3) When the answer sets up a setoff, by way of defense, the reply of the plaintiff.

[Code 1881 s 1757; 1873 p 344 s 56; 1854 p 231 s 44; RRS s 1779.]